Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1868.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 2607 of Title 66 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a subsection to read:§ 2607. Rates and forms of compensation.* * *(g) Transportation fee.--(1) A transportation network company shall collect a transportation fee of 95¢ from each trip. The transportation fee collected shall be remitted to the Department of Revenue.(2) The transportation fee collected under paragraph (1) shall be deposited in the State Treasury in accordance with the following:(i) One-third into the Public Transportation Trust 12345678910111213141516171819 Fund.(ii) One-third into the State Highway Transfer Restoration Restricted Account within the Motor License Fund.(iii) One-third into the Motor License Fund for road and bridge projects.Section 2. Section 9511(g)(1) of Title 75 is amended and subsection (g) is amended by adding a paragraph to read:§ 9511. Allocation of proceeds.* * *(g) Use of funds in the State Highway Transfer Restoration Restricted Account.--The funds appropriated in subsection (b) for deposit in the State Highway Transfer Restoration Restricted Account shall be used to pay for the costs of restoration of such highways as provided in Chapter 92 (relating to transfer of State highways) and annual payments to the municipalities for highway maintenance in accordance with the following:(1) [Annual] Subject to paragraph (1.1), annual maintenance payments shall be at the rate of [$4,000] $12,500 per mile for each highway or portion of highway transferred under Chapter 92, section 222 of the act of June 1, 1945 (P.L.1242, No.428), known as the State Highway Law, or any statute enacted in 1981.(1.1) Beginning February 1, 2028, the department shall make automatic adjustments to annual maintenance payments under paragraph (1) every 24 months. The following apply:(i) The automatic adjustments shall be calculated as follows:(A) The department shall determine the percentage increase in the Consumer Price Index for 20250HB1868PN2318 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 All Urban Consumers for each succeeding 24-month period.(B) The percentage increase under clause (A) shall be applied to annual maintenance payments for each highway or portion of highway transferred under section 222 of the State Highway Law or any statute enacted in 1981, and the adjustment shall be rounded to the nearest dollar.(ii) The department shall transmit notice of the automatic adjustment and the calculation to the Legislative Reference Bureau for publication in the next available issue of the Pennsylvania Bulletin.* * *Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1868PN2318 - 3 - 1234567891011121314